Massachusetts, session 194th, H562.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 96 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the second paragraph the following:-
Each public school’s substance use prevention policy shall include plans to educate and
inform students with particular attention to:
(1) the dangers of addictive substance use generally, and especially of opioids, and the
repercussions thereof, and
(2) the immunities granted under section 34A of chapter 94C of the general laws to
encourage the reporting of overdoses.
Schools may employ useful methods based on successful models used in other districts.
Schools may assess the effectiveness of their measures, share successful approaches with others,
of 2

and work for more effective substance use education in collaboration with the department of
public health and the department of elementary and secondary education.
SECTION 2. This act shall go into effect immediately upon its passage.
of 2